Washington statutes.
RCW 36.24.100

Procedure where accused is at large—Delivery of findings to the prosecuting attorney.

If the jury finds that the person was killed and the party committing the homicide is ascertained by the inquisition, but is not in custody, the coroner must deliver the findings of the jury and all documents, testimony, records generated, possessed, or used during the inquest to the prosecuting attorney of the county where the inquest was held.

[ 2016 c 186 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.24.100. Prior: Code 1881 s 2785; 1863 p 561 s 11; 1854 p 437 s 11; RRS s 4190.]